incubator/apertium-pes/dev/apertium-far.far.dix
	<pardef n="melkimofrad1rabtimofrad__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="psg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="melkimofrad2rabtimofrad__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="psg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="melkimofrad3rabtimofrad__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="psg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="melkijam1rabtimofrad__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="ppl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="melkijam2rabtimofrad__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="ppl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="melkijam3rabtimofrad__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ppl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="mafulimofrad1__n">
	<e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="mafulimj2__n">
	<e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="mafulimofrad3__n">
	<e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="zamirgheyrshakhsimafuli__n">
	<e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="zamirgheyrshakhsifaeli__n">
	<e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="mafulijam1__n">
	<e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="mafulijam3__n">
	<e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	</pardefs>

	<e lm="من"><i>من</i><par n="mafulimofrad1__n"/></e>
	<e lm="تو"><i>تو</i><par n="mafulimj2__n"/></e>
	<e lm="او"><i>او</i><par n="mafulimofrad3__n"/></e>
	<e lm="وی"><i>وی</i><par n="mafulimofrad3__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ما"><i>ما</i><par n="mafulijam1__n"/></e>
	<e lm="شما"><i>شما</i><par n="mafulimj2__n"/></e>
	<e lm="آن‌ها"><i>آن‌ها</i><par n="mafulijam3__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آنها"><i>آنها</i><par n="mafulijam3__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ایشان"><i>ایشان</i><par n="mafulijam3__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آنان"><i>آنان</i><par n="mafulijam3__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آن"><i>آن</i><par n="zamirgheyrshakhsimafuli__n"/></e>
	<e lm="آن"><i>آن</i><par n="zamirgheyrshakhsifaeli__n"/></e>
